Washington statutes.
RCW 27.18.050

Withdrawal—Compact administrator to send and receive notices.

In the event of withdrawal from the compact the compact administrator shall send and receive any notices required by Article XI(b) of the compact.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 93 s 5.]